California, session 20252026, SB989.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 5974.5 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:5974.5. (a) In addition to directly filing a petition to commence the CARE process, a first responder, as identified in subdivision (f) of Section 5974, may contact the county behavioral health agency of the county in which the individual resides, or is found, if they believe that the individual meets or is likely to meet criteria to qualify for the CARE process, as described in Section 5972, and request the county behavioral health agency file a petition to commence the CARE process.(b) The request pursuant to this subdivision shall include the name and contact information for the individual, including a telephone number and address, if available, and other information as specified by the department.(c) Within 30 business days of the request, the county behavioral health agency shall complete a review of the request and shall determine whether to file a petition in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.(d) Upon completion of the review required under subdivision (c), the county behavioral health agency shall notify the first responder who made the referral of both of the following:(1) The outcome of their review, including whether or not a petition to commence the CARE process was filed.(2) Whether or not the respondent individual met the criteria to qualify for the CARE process.(e) In accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 5984, the department shall develop a referral form to be used by the first responder and shall issue guidance regarding the procedure to request that a county behavioral health agency file a petition to commence the CARE process for the respondent. individual.(f) The department shall include data regarding requests made pursuant to this section as part of the annual CARE Act report required by Section 5985.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 3.___________________